Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Part 2

General Provisions of the Board

60-1-201. [Reserved.]

The board has jurisdiction and authority:

Over all persons and property necessary to enforce this chapter;

To make such inquiries as necessary to determine whether or not waste exists or is imminent;

To collect data; to make investigations and inspections; to examine properties, leases, papers, books, and records including drilling records and logs; to examine, check, test, and gauge oil and gas wells, tanks, refineries, and modes of transportation; to hold hearings; to provide for the keeping of records and making of reports; and to take such action as may be necessary to enforce this chapter;

To make rules, regulations, and orders for the following purposes:

To require the drilling, casing, and plugging of wells in such manner as to prevent the escaping of oil and gas out of one (1) stratum to another; to prevent intrusion of water to oil and gas strata; to prevent pollution of fresh water by oil, gas, or salt water; to protect potentially minable coal and other minerals; and to require bond for the plugging of each dry or abandoned well;

To require notification to the supervisor, upon such forms as the supervisor may prescribe, of the intention to drill any well for oil or gas;

To require the filing of logs, including electrical logs and drilling records, cores and drill cutting samples, and all other downhole surveys and information, within thirty (30) days following the cessation of drilling operations of the well;

To prevent wells from being drilled, operated, and produced in such manner as to cause injury to neighboring leases or property;

To prevent the drowning by water of any oil and gas stratum in paying quantities, and to prevent the premature and irregular encroachment of water which would affect the total ultimate recovery of oil and gas;

To require the operation of wells with efficient gas-oil ratios and to fix such ratios;

To prevent “blow outs,” “caving” and “seepage” in the same sense that conditions indicated by such terms are generally understood in the oil and gas business;

To prevent fires;

To identify ownership of oil and gas wells, producing leases, refineries, tanks, plants, structures, and all storage and transportation equipment and facilities;

To regulate the “shooting” and chemical treatment of wells;

To regulate secondary recovery methods;

To regulate the spacing of wells;

To provide for the forced integration of separately owned tracts and other property ownership into drilling and production units;

To provide that the board may, in the absence of a voluntary agreement and after a sixty-day notice to owners, force a volumetric or surface poolwide unit; provided, that the pool producers owning more than fifty percent (50%) of the pool acreage request such unitization of the pool;

In the absence of an acceptable plan of unitization by the operators, the board may shut in the pool to prevent waste and to protect correlative rights until an acceptable plan is presented by the operators;

To regulate and prescribe procedures with respect to applications for and determinations of whether natural gas produced from a well qualifies for a requested status under § 102, 103, 107 or 108 of the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978, Public Law No. 95-621, 92 Stat. 3350 (including any act of Congress which amends or supersedes those sections of that act);

To require that any person conducting oil or gas operations, or causing surface disturbances preparatory to or incidental to such operations, conduct such operations in a manner which will prevent or mitigate adverse environmental impacts, such as soil erosion and water pollution, and perform reclamation of all areas disturbed by the operations, including access roads, as prescribed by part 7 of this chapter; and

To require that any person conducting oil and gas operations, or causing surface disturbances preparatory to or incidental to such operations, for wells permitted and drilled after July 1, 1987, post a bond or bonds to secure compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the rules promulgated under this chapter, both for plugging of the wells and reclamation of the surface in an amount not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per single well site. At sites with more than one (1) well, the portion of the bond or bonds to secure compliance with plugging requirements shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per well. The bond shall be filed with the supervisor at the time an operator's permit application is submitted, and shall be effective from the time the initial surface disturbances begin. As an alternative to the performance bond required in this subdivision (a)(4)(R), a person may submit:

A federally insured certificate of deposit issued by any financial institution in this state to be placed in a separate departmental account that shall not revert to the general fund;

An irrevocable letter of credit issued by any federally insured bank or savings and loan association; or

Other cash or securities in an amount mutually agreed to by the supervisor and the operator, to be placed in a separate departmental account that shall not revert to the general fund.

The applicant for any permit must swear to facts set out in any application for a permit to drill or deepen a well, or reopen a plugged or abandoned well, under the rules made by the board pursuant to this title.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.5; Acts 1971, ch. 280, §§ 2-4; 1972, ch. 541, § 1; 1977, ch. 46, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-104; Acts 1984, ch. 677, § 2; 1987, ch. 257, § 2; 1992, ch. 618, § 1; 2007, ch. 362, §§ 4-7; 2012, ch. 986, § 32.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Sections 102, 103, 107, 108 and 503 of the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978, Public Law No. 95-621, 92 Stat. 3350, are codified as 15 U.S.C. §§ 3312, 3313, 3317, 3318, and 3413, respectively.

Cross-References. Maximum term of leases, § 66-7-103.

Law Reviews.

Conservation of Oil and Gas in Tennessee (Phillip J. Sheehe), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 323.

60-1-203. Quorum of board.

Any three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but three (3) affirmative votes shall be necessary for the adoption of any rule or order of the board.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.2; Acts 1978, ch. 791, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-106.

60-1-204. Rules, regulations, and orders of board.

The board shall prescribe its rules of order, procedure in hearings or other proceedings before it under this chapter.

No rule or order, in the absence of an emergency, may be made by the board except after a public hearing upon at least ten (10) days' notice in a manner and form prescribed by the board. Such public hearing shall be held at such time, place, and manner as may be prescribed by the board and any person having any interest in the subject matter of the hearing shall be entitled to be heard.

If an emergency appears to the board to exist, it may act without a public hearing and the rule, regulation, or order shall be valid. This emergency rule or regulation shall remain in force not longer than fifteen (15) days after its effective date, and, in any event, shall expire when the rule or regulation made after due notice and hearing shall become effective.

All rules and regulations of the board shall be entered in writing by the supervisor in a book kept for such purposes, which shall be a public record and open to inspection. A copy of such rules and regulations certified by the supervisor shall be received in evidence in all courts in this state with the same effect as the original.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-107.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

60-1-205. Power to subpoena and swear witnesses.

The board, or any member thereof, is empowered to issue subpoenas for witnesses, to require their attendance and the giving of testimony before it, and to require the production of books, papers and records in any proceeding before the board as may be material upon questions lawfully before the board. Such subpoenas shall be served by the sheriff or any other officer authorized by law to serve process in this state. No person shall be excused from attending and testifying, or from producing books, papers and records before the board or a court, or from obedience to the subpoena of the board or a court, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of such person may tend to incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed as requiring any person to produce any books, papers or records, or to testify in response to any inquiry, not pertinent to some question lawfully before such board or court for determination. No natural person shall be subjected to criminal prosecution or to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which the person may be required to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the board or court, or in obedience to its subpoena; provided, that no person testifying shall be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

In case of failure or refusal on the part of any person to comply with any subpoena issued by the board or any members thereof, or in case of the refusal of any witness to testify or answer to any matter regarding which the person may be lawfully interrogated, any circuit court in this state in the county where the board is sitting, on application of the board, may in term time or vacation, issue an attachment for such person and compel the person to comply with such subpoena and to attend before the board and produce such documents, and give testimony upon such matters, as may be lawfully required, and such court shall have the power to punish for contempt as in case of disobedience of like subpoenas issued by or from such court, or for a refusal to testify therein. The chair or any member of the board is authorized to administer oaths to witnesses, and any false swearing shall constitute perjury and be punished in accordance with the general criminal statutes relating to perjury.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 754, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-108.

Cross-References. Perjury, title 39, ch. 16, part 7.

60-1-206. Enforcement of chapter.

The supervisor is charged with enforcing this chapter and the regulations and orders of the board.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-109.

60-1-207. Employment of personnel.

The oil and gas supervisor, with the concurrence of the board, shall have the authority, and it shall be the supervisor's duty to employ all necessary personnel to carry out this chapter.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-110.

60-1-208. Travel expenses.

Board members and the supervisor shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(63); T.C.A., § 60-119.

60-1-209. Notice to surface owners of oil and gas estates.

No later than the filing of the application with the board for a permit to drill and prior to initiating any site preparation, the applicant shall give notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, of the applicant's intent to drill to the property owner or owners of the surface of the land to be drilled or to be affected by the surface disturbances listed in subdivision (a)(3).

The property owners to be notified under this section shall be the property owners of record in the property tax assessor's office in the county where the property is located.

The notice shall include the proposed location of the oil or gas well site, the proposed location of all new ingress and egress, the location of all diversions, drilling pits, dikes, and related structures and facilities, the location of proposed storage tanks and all other surface disturbances.

The notice shall state that the property owner and applicant have fifteen (15) working days from the date of mailing to discuss the location of surface disturbances in connection with the drilling operation. It shall also state that if the property owner and applicant are unable to resolve differences regarding the location of surface disturbances, either or both may request in writing a hearing before the supervisor or the supervisor's designee. The notice shall provide the name and address of the supervisor.

The applicant and the property owners given notice under subsection (a) shall attempt to resolve any differences between them regarding surface disturbances related to the proposed drilling operation.

Any property owners entitled to notice or the applicant may request, within fifteen (15) working days of the mailing of the notice required in subsection (a), that the supervisor or the supervisor's designee conduct a hearing. A request for hearing under this section shall be in writing to the supervisor by certified mail, return receipt requested. The purpose of the hearing will be to minimize the impact of the proposed drilling operation on the surface of the land.

The hearing shall be conducted as a contested case pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, title 4, chapter 5, part 3, and shall be held before a hearing officer sitting alone. For purposes of the hearing, the supervisor or the supervisor's designee shall be the hearing officer. The hearing shall be held within ten (10) working days of receipt of a request for hearing by the supervisor or the supervisor's designee and shall be held in the county of the proposed oil and gas well. Notice of the hearing shall be given to all persons entitled to notice under subsection (a) and the applicant.

The hearing officer shall render a decision within ten (10) calendar days of the hearing. The decision shall be considered a final order not subject to further agency review pursuant to § 4-5-315(a)(1).

For purposes of this subsection (b), “working day” means all calendar days excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays as designated in § 15-1-101.

Notwithstanding any other requirements for a permit to drill, such a permit may only issue:

If the applicant submits to the supervisor statements of no objection signed by all property owners entitled to notice under subsection (a);

If a hearing is not requested as provided in subdivision (b)(2); or

Upon the issuing of a final order pursuant to subdivision (b)(4).

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 1.